Hawaii statutes.
§431:10H-117 Authority to adopt rules.
The commissioner may adopt reasonable rules to promote premium adequacy and to
protect the policyholder in the event of substantial rate increases, and to
establish minimum standards for marketing practices, producer compensation,
producer testing, penalties, and reporting practices for long-term care
insurance. [L 1999, c 93, pt of §2; am L 2003, c 212, §95]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next